North Carolina, session 2025, HB857.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Subpart B of Part 5 of Article 13 of Chapter 143B of the General
Statutes is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-1022A. North Carolina Missing with Disability Alert System established.
(a) There is established within the North Carolina Center for Missing Persons the North
Carolina Missing with Disability Alert System. The purpose of the Missing with Disability Alert
System is to provide a statewide system for the rapid dissemination of information regarding a
missing person or missing child who is believed to be a person with a disability as defined by
G.S. 168A-3(7a) that, in light of the person's or child's missing status, requires the person or child
to be protected from potential abuse or other physical harm, neglect, or exploitation.
(b) If the Center or a law enforcement agency receives a request that involves a missing
person or missing child as described in subsection (a) of this section, the Center or law
enforcement agency shall issue an alert providing for rapid dissemination of information
statewide regarding the missing person or missing child. The Center or law enforcement agency
shall make every effort to disseminate the information as quickly as possible when the person's
or child's status as missing has been reported to a law enforcement agency.
(c) The Center and all law enforcement agencies shall adopt guidelines and develop
procedures for issuing an alert for missing persons and missing children as described in
subsection (a) of this section and shall provide education and training to encourage radio and
television broadcasters to participate in the alert. The guidelines and procedures shall ensure that
specific health information about the missing person or missing child is not made public through
the alert or otherwise.
(d) The Center and all law enforcement agencies shall consult with the Department of
Transportation and develop a procedure for the use of overhead permanent changeable message
signs to provide information on the missing person or missing child meeting the criteria of this
section when information is available that would enable motorists to assist in the recovery of the
missing person or missing child. The Center and the Department of Transportation shall develop
guidelines for the content, length, and frequency of any message to be placed on an overhead
permanent changeable message sign."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H857-v-1*